New York, session 2025-2026, S10280.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 136 of the executive law, as amended by chapter 143 2 of the laws of 1991, subdivision 3 as amended by chapter 104 of the laws 3 of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 136. Notarial fees. A notary public shall be entitled to the follow- 5 ing fees: 6 1. For administering an oath or affirmation, and certifying the same 7 when required, except where another fee is specifically prescribed by 8 statute, [two] five dollars. 9 2. For taking and certifying the acknowledgment or proof of execution 10 of a written instrument, by one person, [two] five dollars, and by each 11 additional person, [two] five dollars, for swearing each witness there- 12 to, [two] five dollars. 13 3. For electronic notarial services, established in section one 14 hundred thirty-five-c of this [chapter] article, a fee set through regu- 15 lation by the secretary of state. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07200-01-5